Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.200

Warrant may call for apprehension of offending party.

The court or judge may also, if the same be deemed necessary, insert in the warrant a command for the apprehension of the person charged with causing the illegal restraint.

[Code 1881 s 683; 1877 p 141 s 687; 1869 p 159 s 623; 1854 p 214 s 451; RRS s 1081.]